src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@nooruslikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@n`oorusl´ikkus SUULINE ;
nooruspäev+N:n´oorus#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
nooruspõlv+N:n´oorus#p´õl, PÕLV ;
@P.NomStem.First@noos+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´oos, TAUD ;
noot+N:n´oot%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@noot+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´oot, TAUD ;
nooteater+N:noo#t´eatE2r REDEL ;
noova+N:noova PERE ;
nopped+N:n´opP1e PINGE ;
noppimine+N:n´oppimine OLULINE ;
@R.Part.One@@P.NomStem.First@nord+N:@R.Part.One@@P.NomStem.First@n´ord TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@norg+N:@R.Part.One@n´orG1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
norija+N:norija AASTA ;
norin+N:norin MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@norm+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´orm TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@normaal+N:@P.NomStem.First@norm´aal TAUD ;
normaalaeg+N:norm´aal#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@normaalsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@norm´aalsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@normann+N:@P.NomStem.First@norm´an,n TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@normatiiv+N:@P.NomStem.First@n`ormat´iiv TAUD ;
normatiivakt+N:n`ormat´iiv#´akt TAUD ;
normeerimine+N:norm´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@normikohasus+N:@P.NomStem.First@normi#kohasus OLULINE ;
normistik+N:n`ormist´ik ELANIK ;
norralane+N:norralane OLULINE ;
norralanna+N:norralanna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@norsatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@norsatus OLULINE ;
norse+N:n´orsK1e PINGE ;
norskamine+N:n´orskamine OLULINE ;
norutamine+N:norutamine OLULINE ;
norutuju+N:noru#tuju%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
norutunne+N:noru#t´unnD1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@norutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@norutus OLULINE ;
nosin+N:nosin MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nospel+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ospE2l REDEL ;
nostalgia+N:nost´algia AASTA ;
nostalgiahoog+N:nost´algia#h´ooG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
nosu+N:nos,u KAVA ;
nosunina+N:nos,u#nina%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@notar+N:@P.NomStem.First@notar REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@notariaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@notari´aat TAUD ;
notaribüroo+N:notari#bür´oo ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@notatsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@notatsi´oon TAUD ;
noteerimine+N:not´eerimine OLULINE ;
noteerimiskomisjon+N:not´eerimis#komisjon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@notiits+N:@P.NomStem.First@not´iits TAUD ;
nototeenia+N:notot´eenia AASTA ;
notsu+N:not,su PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nott+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ot,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@novaator+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov´aator REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@novaatorlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov´aatorlus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@novell+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov´el,l TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@novellett+N:@P.NomStem.First@novell´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@novellikirjandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov`el,li#kirjandus OLULINE ;
novellikirjanik+N:nov`el,li#k`irjan´ik ELANIK ;
novellikogu+N:nov`el,li#kogu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
novellikogumik+N:nov`el,li#k`ogum´ik ELANIK ;
novellilooming+N:nov`el,li#looming VIRSIK ;
novellimeister+N:nov`el,li#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
novelliraamat+N:nov`el,li#raamat VIRSIK ;
novellisari+N:nov`el,li#s´arJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@novellist+N:@P.NomStem.First@novell´ist TAUD ;
novellistika+N:novell`is,tika AASTA ;
novellitoodang+N:nov`el,li#toodang VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@november+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov´embE2r REDEL ;
novembrikuu+N:nov´embri#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@noviits+N:@P.NomStem.First@nov´iits TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@novokaiin+N:@P.NomStem.First@novoka´iin TAUD ;
nublakas+N:nublaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nubuk+N:@P.NomStem.First@nubuk REDEL ;
nubul+N:nubul MAGUS ;
nudipea+N:nud,i#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
nudisaba+N:nud,i#saba%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
nudism+N:nud´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@nudistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nudistus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nudisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nudisus OLULINE ;
nuga+N:nuG1a%>%{pl.e%} KAVA ;
nugiline+N:nugiline OLULINE ;
nugiloom+N:nugi#l´oom%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@nugis+N:@P.NomStem.First@nugis SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuheldavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nuheldavus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuhk+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´uhK1 TAUD ;
nuhkimine+N:n´uhkimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuhtlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´uhtlus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuhtlusseadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´uhtlus#s´eadus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nui+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ui%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
nukits+N:nukits MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukk+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukk+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukk%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukk+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
nukleiinhape+N:nukle´iin#h´apP1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukleon+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukleon MUUSEUM ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukleotiid+N:@P.NomStem.First@nukleot´iid TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukrameelsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukra#m´eelsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukrus+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ukrus SUULINE ;
nukrustunne+N:n´ukrus#t´unnD1e PINGE ;
nukuke+N:nukuke PEENIKE ;
nukuteater+N:nuku#t´eatE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@nukuvalitsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nuku#valitsus OLULINE ;
nulg+N:n´ulG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@null+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ul,l TAUD ;
nullkraad+N:n´ul,l#kr´aad, TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@number+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´umbE2r REDEL ;
numbrilaud+N:n´umbri#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
numbrimärk+N:n´umbri#m´ärk TAUD ;
numbrituba+N:n´umbri#tuB1a%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@numeraal+N:@P.NomStem.First@n`umer´aal TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@numeraator+N:@P.NomStem.First@numer´aator REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@numeratsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@numeratsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@numeroloog+N:@P.NomStem.First@n`umerol´oog TAUD ;
numeroloogia+N:numerol´oogia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@numismaatik+N:@P.NomStem.First@numismaatik VIRSIK ;
numismaatika+N:numismaatika AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@nummerdus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nummerdus OLULINE ;
nunn+N:n´unn%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuntsius+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´untsius OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nupp+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´upp%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuppel+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´uppE2l REDEL ;
nuppsuu+N:n´upp#s´uuH3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%} PUU ;
nups+N:n´ups%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
nupuke+N:nupuke PEENIKE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nupukus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nupukus OLULINE ;
nupumees+N:nupu#me MEES ;
nupustik+N:n`upust´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuputus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nuputus OLULINE ;
@R.Part.One@nurg+N:@R.Part.One@n´urG1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
nurgake+N:nurgake PEENIKE ;
nurgakivi+N:nurga#kivi%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
nurgalaud+N:nurga#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
nurgalöök+N:nurga#l´öök TAUD ;
nurganaine+N:nurga#naine NAINE ;
nurgatagune+N:nurga#tagune SOOLANE ;
nurgatempel+N:nurga#t´empE2l REDEL ;
nurgavoodi+N:nurga#v´ood,i AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurgelisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nurgelisus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurgik+N:@P.NomStem.First@nurgik VIRSIK ;
nurin+N:nurin MAGUS ;
nuripool+N:nuri#p´ool%{stemill%} KEEL ;
nurisemine+N:nurisemine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurisünnitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nuri#sün,nitus OLULINE ;
nurjaminek+N:n´urja#minek VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurjatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nurjatus OLULINE ;
nurjumine+N:n´urjumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurk+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´urk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurm+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´urm%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
nurmenukk+N:nurme#n´ukk%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@nurmik+N:@P.NomStem.First@nurmik VIRSIK ;
nurmikas+N:nurmika LOHAKAS ;
nurmkana+N:n´urm#kana%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
nurr+N:n´urr%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
nurrumine+N:n´urrumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@nutikus+N:@P.NomStem.First@nut,ikus OLULINE ;
nutimees+N:nut,i#me MEES ;
nutria+N:n´utria AASTA ;
nuts+N:n´uts%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@nutsak+N:@P.NomStem.First@nutsak VIRSIK ;
nutsakas+N:nutsaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nutt+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´ut,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@nutt+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuttur+N:@P.NomStem.First@n´uttur REDEL ;
nutuhääl+N:nutu#h´ääl%{stemill%} KEEL ;
nutulaul+N:nutu#l´aul%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
nutulugu+N:nutu#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
nutuluks+N:nutu#l´uks%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
nutunaine+N:nutu#naine NAINE ;
nutupill+N:nutu#p´il,l TAUD ;
nutusilm+N:nutu#s´ilm%>%{pl.i%} SILM ;
